test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-bakteer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - bakteer: # 1B
    bakteer+N+Sg+Nom: bakteer
    bakteer+N+Sg+Gen: bakteer
    bakteer+N+Sg+Acc: bakteer
    bakteer+N+Sg+Ill: bakterân
    bakteer+N+Sg+Loc: bakterist
    bakteer+N+Sg+Com: bakteráin
    bakteer+N+Sg+Abe: bakteerttáá
    bakteer+N+Ess:    bakterin
    bakteer+N+Par:    bakterid
    bakteer+N+Pl+Nom: baktereh
    bakteer+N+Pl+Gen: bakterij
    bakteer+N+Pl+Acc: bakterijd
    bakteer+N+Pl+Ill: bakteráid
    bakteer+N+Pl+Loc: bakterijn
    bakteer+N+Pl+Com: bakterijguin
    bakteer+N+Pl+Abe: bakterijttáá
